ess.lexc
[1Sg][4Sg]:umni        EncliticOrEnd; [1Sg][4Pl]:umteng     EncliticOrEnd; [1Sg][4Du]:umtek       EncliticOrEnd; 
[1Pl][4Sg]:umnni       EncliticOrEnd; [1Pl][4Pl]:umteng     EncliticOrEnd; [1Pl][4Du]:umtek       EncliticOrEnd; 
[1Du][4Sg]:umtegnegu   EncliticOrEnd; [1Du][4Pl]:umteng     EncliticOrEnd; [1Du][4Du]:umtek       EncliticOrEnd; 
|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|
[2Sg][4Sg]:uvgu        EncliticOrEnd; [2Sg][4Pl]:ufki       EncliticOrEnd; [2Sg][4Du]:ufkek       EncliticOrEnd; 
[2Pl][4Sg]:ufsigu      EncliticOrEnd; [2Pl][4Pl]:ufsiki     EncliticOrEnd; [2Pl][4Du]:ufsikek     EncliticOrEnd; 
[2Du][4Sg]:uftegnegu   EncliticOrEnd; [2Du][4Pl]:uftegneki  EncliticOrEnd; [2Du][4Du]:uftegnekek  EncliticOrEnd; 
|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|
|                                   |                                    |                                     |
|                                   |                                    |                                     |
|                                   |                                    |                                     |
|-----------------------------------|------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|


LEXICON IntransitiveSubordinative
!-----------------------|-------------------------|-------------------------|
[3Sg]:ni   EncliticOrEnd; [1Sg]:nga  EncliticOrEnd; [2Sg]:ten  EncliticOrEnd; 
[3Pl]:teng EncliticOrEnd; [1Pl]:ta   EncliticOrEnd; [2Pl]:si   EncliticOrEnd; 
[3Du]:tek  EncliticOrEnd; [1Du]:tung EncliticOrEnd; [2Du]:tek  EncliticOrEnd; 
!-----------------------|-------------------------|-------------------------|

LEXICON TransitiveSubordinative
|-------------------------|--------------------------|----------------------------|
[_][3Sg]:ku  EncliticOrEnd; [_][3Pl]:ki EncliticOrEnd; [_][3Du]:kek  EncliticOrEnd; 
[_][1Sg]:nga EncliticOrEnd; [_][1Pl]:ta EncliticOrEnd; [_][1Du]:tung EncliticOrEnd; 
[_][2Sg]:ten EncliticOrEnd; [_][2Pl]:si EncliticOrEnd; [_][2Du]:tek  EncliticOrEnd; 
|-------------------------|--------------------------|----------------------------|



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                         !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Postural Roots and Postbases              !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                         !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PosRootPostbase

-mete:mete    VerbIntr2;
-nga:nga      VerbIntr2;
-te:te        VerbIntr2;
-te:te        VerbTrns2;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                                !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Quantifier-Qualifier Constructions               !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                                !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON QuantQual

allakagh*      QuantQualPostbase; ! separately (from the others)
ellnginagh*    QuantQualPostbase; ! alone; only
kezeghhagh*    QuantQualPostbase; ! alone; only
kezemaghhagh*  QuantQualPostbase; ! only; alone; by oneself
iingunagh*     QuantQualPostbase; ! all; whole
qerngagh*      QuantQualPostbase; ! together
tamaghhagh*    QuantQualPostbase; ! all, every, both (for dual)


LEXICON QuantQualPostbase

!---------------------------------|
!  Quantifier-Qualifier Endings   |
!----------------------------------------------|
[Quant_Qual][3Sg]:~%:(ng₁)an      EncliticOrEnd;
[Quant_Qual][3Pl]:~%:(ng₁)ita     EncliticOrEnd;                
[Quant_Qual][3Du]:~%:(ng₁)ita     EncliticOrEnd;
!----------------------------------------------|
[Quant_Qual][1Sg]:~f-wma          EncliticOrEnd;
[Quant_Qual][1Pl]:%:emta          EncliticOrEnd;
[Quant_Qual][1Du]:%:emtung        EncliticOrEnd;
!----------------------------------------------|
[Quant_Qual][2Sg]:–gpek           EncliticOrEnd;
[Quant_Qual][2Pl]:–gpesi          EncliticOrEnd;
[Quant_Qual][2Du]:–gpetek         EncliticOrEnd;
!----------------------------------------------|
[Quant_Qual][4Sg]:~f-wmi          EncliticOrEnd;
[Quant_Qual][4Pl]:~f-wmeng        EncliticOrEnd;
[Quant_Qual][4Du]:%:egmek         EncliticOrEnd;
!----------------------------------------------|



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                           !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Emotional Roots and Postbases               !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                           !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PosturalRoot
aaghw        PosRootPostbase;   ! upside down
aaghw        QuantQualPostbase; ! upside down
agagh        PosRootPostbase;   ! hanging
agagh        QuantQualPostbase; ! hanging
agitagh      PosRootPostbase;   ! open-mouthed
agitagh      QuantQualPostbase; ! open-mouthed
agugh        PosRootPostbase;   ! bending; turning
agugh        QuantQualPostbase; ! bending; turning
amsikagh*    PosRootPostbase;   ! naked
amsikagh*    QuantQualPostbase; ! naked
aqumgagh*    PosRootPostbase;   ! sitting
aqumgagh*    QuantQualPostbase; ! sitting
asigh        PosRootPostbase;   ! tied in a bundle
asigh        QuantQualPostbase; ! tied in a bundle
avlegh       PosRootPostbase;   ! with legs spread; with parts which are joined at one end spread apart at the other end
avlegh       QuantQualPostbase; ! with legs spread; with parts which are joined at one end spread apart at the other end
enleg        PosRootPostbase;   ! attached or fastened to something secure; ! foundation; main part
enleg        QuantQualPostbase; ! attached or fastened to something secure; ! foundation; main part
estugh       PosRootPostbase;   ! with legs stretched out
estugh       QuantQualPostbase; ! with legs stretched out
guugh        PosRootPostbase;   ! bent forward with head down
guugh        QuantQualPostbase; ! bent forward with head down
iggag        PosRootPostbase;   ! leaning; tilting
iggag        QuantQualPostbase; ! leaning; tilting
ighigh       PosRootPostbase;   ! tilting (especially one's head)
ighigh       QuantQualPostbase; ! tilting (especially one's head)
ikigh        PosRootPostbase;   ! open
ikigh        QuantQualPostbase; ! open
ingagh*      PosRootPostbase;   ! lying down
ingagh*      QuantQualPostbase; ! lying down
iqrag        PosRootPostbase;   ! uneven; distorted
iqrag        QuantQualPostbase; ! uneven; distorted
kagtagh      PosRootPostbase;   ! concealed; secluded
kagtagh      QuantQualPostbase; ! concealed; secluded
kallngugh    PosRootPostbase;   ! assembled; gathered
kallngugh    QuantQualPostbase; ! assembled; gathered
kiimllug     PosRootPostbase;   ! dim
kiimllug     QuantQualPostbase; ! dim
matagh*      PosRootPostbase;   ! undressed; parka-less; coat-less
matagh*      QuantQualPostbase; ! undressed; parka-less; coat-less
mayagh       PosRootPostbase;   ! being or becoming thin
mayagh       QuantQualPostbase; ! being or becoming thin
mumig        PosRootPostbase;   ! turned over; translated
mumig        QuantQualPostbase; ! turned over; translated
naghllug     PosRootPostbase;   ! head downwards
naghllug     QuantQualPostbase; ! head downwards
nakugh       PosRootPostbase;   ! eyes crossed
nakugh       QuantQualPostbase; ! eyes crossed
nanugh       PosRootPostbase;   ! hanging lengthwise
nanugh       QuantQualPostbase; ! hanging lengthwise
napagh       PosRootPostbase;   ! erect; upright
napagh       QuantQualPostbase; ! erect; upright
nekeg        PosRootPostbase;   ! put in place; having a good home; quieted down 
nekeg        QuantQualPostbase; ! put in place; having a good home; quieted down 
nekevghagh*  PosRootPostbase;   ! standing
nekevghagh*  QuantQualPostbase; ! standing
nevagh       PosRootPostbase;   ! lying on the back
nevegh       QuantQualPostbase; ! lying on the back
qanimigh     PosRootPostbase;   ! finished; worked on toward completion
qanimigh     QuantQualPostbase; ! finished; worked on toward completion
qavigh       PosRootPostbase;   ! slanted; diagonal
qavigh       QuantQualPostbase; ! slanted; diagonal
qetegh       PosRootPostbase;   ! spinal area of a person; back of person
qetegh       QuantQualPostbase; ! spinal area of a person; back of person
qunagh       PosRootPostbase;   ! eyes closed; dead
qunagh       QuantQualPostbase; ! eyes closed; dead
qunegh       PosRootPostbase;   ! eyes closed; dead
qunegh       QuantQualPostbase; ! eyes closed; dead
qutngugh     PosRootPostbase;   ! bending over forward with head down while in a sitting position
qutngugh     QuantQualPostbase; ! bending over forward with head down while in a sitting position
sanigh       PosRootPostbase;   ! sideways
sanigh       QuantQualPostbase; ! sideways
saqfigh      PosRootPostbase;   ! toes turned out
saqfigh      QuantQualPostbase; ! toes turned out
segesqugh    PosRootPostbase;   ! kneeling
segesqugh    QuantQualPostbase; ! kneeling
sivug        PosRootPostbase;   ! head tilted up
sivug        QuantQualPostbase; ! head tilted up
suflitagh    PosRootPostbase;   ! lying on stomach
suflitagh    QuantQualPostbase; ! lying on stomach
supag        PosRootPostbase;   ! tilted; slanted; leaning; at an angle
supag        QuantQualPostbase; ! tilted; slanted; leaning; at an angle
suqlugh      PosRootPostbase;   ! crumpled; folded in to narow an opening; bent
suqlugh      QuantQualPostbase; ! crumpled; folded in to narow an opening; bent
taklagh      PosRootPostbase;   ! spread out; stretched out
taklagh      QuantQualPostbase; ! spread out; stretched out
teghleg      PosRootPostbase;   ! fastened securely over something
teghleg      QuantQualPostbase; ! fastened securely over something
tutugh       PosRootPostbase;   ! folded over with a crease.
tutugh       QuantQualPostbase; ! folded over with a crease.
ulmig        PosRootPostbase;   ! turned over; inside out
ulmig        QuantQualPostbase; ! turned over; inside out
ulpeg        PosRootPostbase;   ! folded back on itself (like a turned up pants leg)
ulpeg        QuantQualPostbase; ! folded back on itself (like a turned up pants leg)
